New York, session 2025-2026, S6566.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 65 of the public service law is amended by adding 2 two new subdivisions 5-a and 5-b to read as follows: 3 5-a. No gas corporation, electric corporation or municipality shall, 4 without the express written consent of the consumer, monitor, record, 5 collect or store data from any meter or apparatus which provides such 6 corporation or municipality with a measure of the use of natural gas or 7 electricity for any period of time less than one month or the billing 8 cycle, whichever shall be greater. No fee or rate fee shall be charged 9 to those consumers who withhold such consent. 10 5-b. No gas corporation, electric corporation or municipality shall 11 enter a residential property without the consent of the owner thereof, 12 except when there is an emergency, or imminent or potential harm to 13 persons or property. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 15 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10693-01-5